California statutes. Public Resources Code
Whenever the department has received and deposited any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund in an excessive amount or in error, or whenever a refund of all or a portion of such money is due any person, firm, or corporation because of the termination of an agreement or other lawful reason, payment of such refund shall be made upon the filing of a claim by the director with the State Controller. The State Controller shall draw his warrant for payment of the refund from any appropriation made for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

707.1.

(a) Any moneys recovered by the department in a civil action to recover state costs related to fire suppression, rescue, or emergency medical services pursuant to Section 13009 of the Health and Safety Code shall be deposited by the department into the Treasury as provided in Section 16305.2 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall, no later than January 10 of each year, submit a report to the Legislature regarding any moneys recovered by the department in a civil action, as described in subdivision (a), in the prior year. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) Name, date, location, and total costs of the fire, and the amount of any federal moneys received.

(B) Settlement or judgment information including the date and total value of the settlement or judgment.

(C) The amount of the settlement or judgment abated against expenses whether state or federal, local remittance, or total General Fund recovery including the abatement of expenses or miscellaneous revenues.

(D) Information specifying whether the settlement, if applicable, was approved at the unit, region, or headquarters level.

(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) All moneys in the account in the Special Deposit Fund entitled “Civil Cost Recovery Investigation Support Account” shall be immediately transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   (SB 1075)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

708.

For the purpose of disseminating information relating to its activities, powers, duties, or functions, the department, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may issue publications, construct and maintain exhibits, and perform such acts and carry on such functions as in the opinion of the director will best tend to disseminate such information.

Such publications may be distributed free of charge to public libraries and to other state departments and state officers. The department may exchange copies with contemporary publications.

All money received by the department from the sale of publications shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

709.

The provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 6 of Title 2 of the Government Code apply to the director. The director may appoint, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, such deputies, officers, and other employees as may be necessary. The director shall assure an adequate number of employees who, by reason of their education or professional qualifications, are equipped to perform the duties required under the Z'berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973, including, but not limited to, the review of timber harvesting plans and performing the necessary inspections of timber operations. The director may authorize any employee of the department, to exercise any power granted to, or perform any duty imposed upon, the director by the State Civil Service Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

710.

The director shall have no power to amend or repeal any order, regulation, ruling, or directive of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

711.

The director, with approval of the Director of Finance, may accept on behalf of the department federal grants for the purposes for which the department is established. Such grants shall be deposited in the Special Deposit Fund in the State Treasury provided for by Section 16370 of the Government Code, and may be expended under such terms and conditions as may be required by the federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

712.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code or of law, and except as provided in the State Building Standards Law, Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code, on and after January 1, 1980, the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, or the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection shall not adopt nor publish a building standard as defined in Section 18909 of the Health and Safety Code unless the provisions of Sections 18930, 18933, 18938, 18940, 18943, 18944, and 18945 of the Health and Safety Code are expressly excepted in the statute under which the authority to adopt rules, regulations, or orders is delegated. Any building standard adopted in violation of this section shall have no force or effect. Any building standard adopted before January 1, 1980, pursuant to this code and not expressly excepted by statute from the provisions of the State Building Standards Law shall remain in effect only until January 1, 1985, or until adopted, amended, or superseded by provisions published in the State Building Standards Code, whichever occurs sooner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

713.

The department is responsible for the fire protection, fire prevention, maintenance, and enhancement of the state’s forest, range, and brushland resources, contract fire protection, associated emergency services, and assistance in civil disasters and other nonfire emergencies. Department programs, as made specific in Division 4 (commencing with Section 4001), are closely related and interdependent. The department shall coordinate programs of fire protection, fire prevention, pest control, and forest and range maintenance and enhancement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

714.

The department is responsible for all of the following:

(a) Providing fire protection, fire prevention, pest control, and forest and range protection and enhancement implements and apparatus as necessary.

(b) Maintaining an integrated staff to accomplish fire protection, fire prevention, pest control, and forest and range protection and enhancement activities as needed.

(c) Establishing and maintaining facilities for the performance of fire protection, fire prevention, pest control, and forest and range protection and enhancement activities.

(d) Enforcing forest and fire laws, the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511), Part 2, Division 4), and other laws specified in Division 4 (commencing with Section 4001).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 411, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

715.

The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, in cooperation with the Office of Emergency Services, shall develop a program to certify active duty military pilots to engage in firefighting in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 473.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

716.

(a) Upon approval by the Department of Finance, the department may exercise the same authority granted to the Division of the State Architect and the Real Estate Services Division in the Department of General Services, to plan, design, construct, and administer contracts and professional services for public works projects under the jurisdiction of the department.

(b) Any right afforded to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) to exercise project planning, design, construction, and administration of contracts and professional services may be revoked, in whole or in part, by the Department of Finance at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 196, Sec. 21.   (SB 143)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

717.

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency shall establish a working group on expanding wood product markets that can utilize woody biomass, especially biomass that is removed from high hazard zones, as determined by the department. These markets include, but are not limited to, animal bedding, biochar, cross-laminated timber, mulch, oriented strand board, pulp, post, shredding, and veneer products.

(b) At a minimum, the working group shall include members of the working group on wood market products established under the Proclamation of a State of Emergency on Tree Mortality declared by the Governor on October 30, 2015.

(c) By June 1,
 2017, the working group shall submit recommendations to the Legislature on actions that may be taken to encourage the development of the wood product markets, including the identification of potential pilot projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 368, Sec. 9.   (SB 859)   Effective September 14, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection [730. - 745.]

730.

(a) There is in the department a State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection consisting of nine members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. 

(b) (1) On and after January 1, 1998, wherever any reference is made in any law to the State Board of Forestry in the department, the reference shall be deemed to be a reference to, and to mean, the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(2) No existing supplies, forms, signs, or logos shall be destroyed or changed to reflect the name change, and they shall continue to be used until exhausted or unserviceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

All members of the board shall be appointed and shall be selected and approved for appointment on the basis of their educational and professional qualifications and their general knowledge of, interest in, and experience with, problems relating to watershed management (including hydrology and soil science), forest management practices, fish and wildlife, range management, forest economics, or land use planning. Five members shall be selected from the general public, three members shall be selected from the forest products industry, and one member shall be selected from the range livestock industry. At no time shall a majority of the members, nor any of the members selected from the general public, be persons with a direct personal financial interest, within the meaning of Section 1120 of the Government Code, in timberlands. All members of the board shall represent the general public interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

731.1.

The Legislature declares that some individuals appointed as members of the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection are required to be chosen from backgrounds in the forest products and range livestock industries in order to represent and further the interests of those industries and that this representation and furtherance serves the general public interest, as specified in Section 731. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, for purposes of persons who hold that office, the forest products and the range livestock industries are tantamount to and constitute the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code in those decisions affecting the forest products or range livestock industries, unless the results of their actions taken as board members have a material financial effect on them distinguishable from their effect on other members of their respective industries generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

Each member of the board shall hold office for four years from the expiration of the term of his or her predecessor. Vacancies shall be immediately filled by the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 257, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

Each member of the board shall receive compensation for each day during which the member engaged in the performance of official duties, except that the total number of days for which a member, other than the chairperson, may be compensated shall not exceed 80 days in any one fiscal year. The chairperson of the board may receive compensation for not more than 100 days in any one fiscal year. In addition to the compensation, each member shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 796, Sec. 2.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

736.

The board shall maintain its headquarters in Sacramento and shall hold meetings at such times and at such places as shall be determined by it. Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting any business of the board. A majority affirmative vote of the total authorized membership of the board shall be necessary to adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations of the board adopted pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 4551) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 4. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

737.

(a) A member of the board shall not participate in a board action pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4601) or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4621) of Chapter 8 of Part 2 of Division 4 that involves the board member or a person with whom the board member is connected as a director, officer, or employee, or in which the board member has a direct personal financial interest within the meaning of Section 1120 of the Government Code.

(b) Upon request of a person or on the Attorney General’s own initiative, the Attorney General may file a complaint in the superior court for the county in which the board has its principal office
 alleging that a board member has knowingly violated this section and the facts upon which the allegation is based and asking that the member be removed from office. Further proceedings shall be in accordance as near as may be with rules governing civil actions. If after trial the court finds that the board member has knowingly violated this section it shall pronounce judgment that the board member be removed from office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 39.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

738.

The Governor shall designate the chair of the board from among the members of the board. The person designated as the chair shall hold the office at the pleasure of the Governor. The board shall annually elect a vice chair from among its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 5.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

739.

The board may appoint an executive officer who shall be exempt from civil service pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 204.)
-------------------------------------------

740.

The board shall represent the state’s interest in the acquisition and management of state forests as provided by law and in federal land matters pertaining to forestry, and the protection of the state’s interests in forest resources on private lands, and shall determine, establish, and maintain an adequate forest policy. General policies for guidance of the department shall be determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

741.

(a) The board shall appoint a Range Management Advisory Committee and shall consult with the advisory committee on rangeland resource issues under consideration by the board.

(b) The advisory committee shall consist of 11 members, who shall be selected as follows:

(1) Three members of the general public, who have an interest and background in the conservation of range resources or special knowledge in the protection of range and brushland soils and watersheds.

(2) One member nominated by the California Association of Resource Conservation Districts.

(3) Seven members nominated by organizations representing owners of range and brushlands.

(c) Members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation.

(d) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, the Secretary for Environmental Protection, and the Secretary of Food and Agriculture shall notify the advisory committee of, and are encouraged to consult with the advisory committee on, rangeland resource issues that are under consideration by the Natural Resources Agency, the California Environmental Protection Agency, and the Department of Food and Agriculture, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 36.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

741.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2025, the Range Management Advisory Committee, established pursuant to Section 741, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, fire ecologists with expertise in the full range of California’s vegetation communities, and the University of California Cooperative Extension Livestock and Natural Resources Advisors and Specialists, shall develop guidance for local or regional prescribed grazing plans. The guidance shall include all of the following:

(1) Best practices for identifying and selecting priority areas for prescribed grazing.

(2) Best practices for developing project plans and metrics for applying, monitoring, and evaluating the
 effectiveness and impacts of prescribed grazing.

(3) Best practices for using prescribed grazing to increase the diversity and abundance of native species and decrease the abundance of invasive species, including through adaptive management, exclusion areas, wildlife-friendly fencing, and monitoring.

(4) Recommendations for securing sufficient land and resources, including forage, needed to pasture livestock when not engaged in a prescribed grazing project.

(5) Best practices for building community support and engaging with public and private landowners to improve the implementation and outcomes of a prescribed grazing plan.

(6) Methods to identify opportunities to house and maintain shared grazing infrastructure.

(7) Best practices to use prescribed grazing to support and enhance prescribed burns and other vegetation management projects.

(8) Best practices for use of prescribed grazing for reducing wildfire risk in and near fire-threatened communities, as that term is defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 4124.5.

(9) Other recommendations to increase the pace and scale of prescribed grazing at the local or regional levels, where appropriate.

(b) The department shall consider and incorporate, at its discretion, the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (a) in the grant program established pursuant to Section 4124.5.

(c) The Department of Conservation shall consider and
 incorporate, where appropriate, the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (a) in the grant program established pursuant to Section 4208.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 772, Sec. 1.   (SB 675)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

743.

State agencies shall submit to the board plans for, and the results of, all investigations that relate to, or have an effect upon, forest resource utilization for review and comment. The board may, at its expense, contract with any state or local agency to investigate and report on any technical factors involved in forest management; provided, that the burden, including costs, of such reports shall bear a reasonable relationship to the needs for the reports and the benefits to be obtained from such reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

745.

The board shall implement a public information program on matters involving forest management and shall maintain an information file on forest management research and other pertinent matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Professional Foresters [750. - 783.]

750.

This article may be known and cited as the Professional Foresters Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

The purpose of this article is to declare the existence of a public interest in the management and treatment of the forest resources and timberlands of this state and to provide for the regulation of persons who practice the profession of forestry and whose activities have an impact upon the ecology of forested landscapes and the quality of the forest environment, and through that regulation to enhance the control of air and water pollution, the preservation of scenic beauty, the protection of watersheds by flood and soil erosion control, the production and increased yield of natural resources, including timber, forage, wildlife, and water, and outdoor recreation, to meet the needs of the people.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 784, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

752.

(a) “Professional forester,” as used in this article, means a person who, by reason of their knowledge of the natural sciences, mathematics, and the principles of forestry, acquired by forestry education and experience, performs services, including, but not limited to, consultation, investigation, evaluation, planning, or responsible supervision of forestry activities when those professional services require the application of forestry principles and techniques.

(b) A professional forester is licensed to perform forestry
 services only in those areas of expertise in which the person is fully competent as a result of training or experience. In order for a professional forester to fulfill all of their responsibilities with regard to a particular activity on a site, if the expertise that is prudently required exceeds the expertise possessed by the professional forester in that regard, the professional forester may need to utilize the services of other qualified experts, including, but not limited to, archaeologists, botanists, civil engineers, ecologists, fisheries biologists, geologists, hydrologists, land surveyors, landscape architects, range scientists, soil scientists, or wildlife biologists. This article shall not preclude those other environmental professionals from the application of their knowledge in their field of expertise outside the practice of forestry, as defined in Section
 753.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 40.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

753.

“Forestry,” as used in this article, refers to the science and practice of managing forested landscapes and the treatment of the forest cover in general, and includes, among other things, the application of scientific knowledge and forestry principles in the fields of fuels management and forest protection, timber growing and utilization, forest inventories, forest economics, forest valuation and finance, and the evaluation and mitigation of impacts from forestry activities on watershed and scenic values, to achieve the purposes of this article. The practice of forestry applies only to those activities undertaken on forested landscapes. The professions specified in Section 772 are not practicing forestry when mitigating or recommending mitigation of impacts from previous forestry activities on related watershed or ecological values within their area of professional expertise or when recommending those mitigations for proposed timber operations. However, public and private foresters are required to be licensed pursuant to this article when making evaluations and determinations of the appropriate overall combination of mitigations of impacts from forestry activities necessary to protect all forest resources.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 784, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

754.

“Forested landscapes” means those tree dominated landscapes and their associated vegetation types on which there is growing a significant stand of tree species, or which are naturally capable of growing a significant stand of native trees in perpetuity, and is not otherwise devoted to nonforestry commercial, urban, or farming uses.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 784, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

755.

“Person” as used in this article means any natural person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

756.

Nothing in this article prohibits any person from engaging in those activities otherwise restricted to professional foresters, certified specialists, or qualified but exempt certificants, provided a registrant is in charge of the professional practice or work of that person and all professional work or documents are done by or under the supervision of the registrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 748, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

757.

This article does not apply to a landowner who is a natural person and who personally performs services of a professional forester, when those services are personally performed on lands owned by
 that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 41.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

758.

This article shall not be construed to authorize a registered professional forester to practice civil engineering as defined in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or to practice land surveying as defined in Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or to practice landscape architecture, as defined in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 748, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

759.

The board may by regulation adopt such rules and regulations pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, as it determines are reasonably necessary to enable it to carry into effect the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

760.

The board shall consider matters pertaining to the registration of professional foresters at least once every six months at regular meetings and may, as necessary, meet solely for the purpose of considering matters to carry out the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

760.5.

The board may hire the clerical and secretarial employees, technical personnel, and other staff who are necessary and budgeted to properly assist the work of the board in carrying out the purposes of this article. This staff personnel shall be subject to the relevant system and procedures of the state civil service. The provisions of the State Civil Service Act contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall apply to that personnel. The executive officer shall be an employee exempt from civil service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 748, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

761.

The board shall keep a complete record of all applications for registration and certification and the board’s action thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

762.

The board may by regulation provide for the issuance of certificates of specialization in such fields of specialization as the board may by regulation establish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

763.

(a) The board shall establish an examining committee of at least seven members composed of the following, who shall be appointed by the board and serve at its pleasure:

(1) Two public members with one selected from the membership of the board.

(2) At least four professional foresters in good standing representing a broad cross section of employment and expertise.

(3) At least one certified specialist registered pursuant to Section 772 in good standing. If a certified specialist is not available to serve on the committee, this position shall be replaced by an additional professional forester in good standing.

(b) The examining committee shall do all of the following:

(1) Examine all applicants for registration as professional foresters and for specialty certificates.

(2) Recommend to the board applicants for the license of professional forester and applicants for specialty certificates who fulfill the requirements of this article.

(3) Review complaints, which review may include independent investigations or expert witness evaluations, and make disciplinary recommendations to the board.

(4) Establish ad hoc committees as needed with representatives of certified specialists.

(5) Recommend to the board whether an independent certification program qualifies for recognition under Section 754.

(6) Recommend adoption of the rules and regulations or changes in rules and regulations which may be needed to effect this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 784, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

764.

A person appointed to serve upon the examining committee shall receive, if requested, one hundred dollars ($100) for each day during which that person is engaged in the performance of their official duties, except that the compensation of each member shall not exceed in any one fiscal year the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000). In addition, each member shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, including travel, at state rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 42.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

765.

The examining committee shall adhere to the rules and regulations of the board. An applicant for a license pursuant to this article who contends that they have been aggrieved by an action taken by the examining committee with respect to their qualifications may appeal to the board in accordance with rules or regulations prescribed by the board. The board upon the appeal may administer an oral or written examination to the applicant as an aid in determining whether the applicant is qualified under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 43.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

766.

On and after July 1, 1973, it shall be unlawful for any person to act in the capacity of, or to use the title of, a professional forester without being registered pursuant to this article, unless exempted from the provisions thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

767.

An applicant for a license pursuant to this article shall apply to the board. Such application shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee in an amount fixed by the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

768.

The board shall require an applicant to demonstrate such degree of experience and such general knowledge of the profession of forestry as the board deems necessary for the protection of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

769.

An applicant shall meet all of the following qualifications:

(a) Be of good moral character and have a good reputation for honesty and integrity.

(b) Furnish evidence of having completed seven years of experience in forestry work.

Possession of a degree of bachelor of science, or equivalent degree as determined by the board, with a major in forestry, shall be deemed equivalent to four years of experience in the actual practice of forestry work.

At least three of the seven years of experience shall include having charge of forestry work, or forestry work under the supervision of a person registered, or qualified for, but exempt from, registration under the provision of this article. Work completed prior to July 1, 1973, shall qualify if it was under the supervision of a qualified forester, as defined in Section 754. The award of a master of forestry degree shall be acceptable as evidence of one year of such qualifying experience.

(c) Has successfully completed such examination or examinations as are prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

770.

(a) Examinations shall be given by the board as often as it is deemed necessary, but at least every six months.

(b) The examination may consist of both written and oral portions. A grade of 75 percent shall be necessary for successful completion of the examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

771.

An applicant failing in an examination may be examined again upon filing a new application and paying the application fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

772.

Instead of being registered as a professional forester, an applicant may request to be registered as a certified specialist in one or more fields of forestry. Nothing in this article shall authorize the board to certify or otherwise license wildlife biologists, fisheries biologists, botanists, ecological restorationists, stream restorationists, hydrologists, or geologists. Registration in a specialty area does not prohibit a professional forester from providing services within that professional forester’s area of expertise. Any public agency or professional society may submit for board recognition its independent certification program as full qualification without examination for the board’s certificate of specialization. That certification as a specialist shall be granted provided the board determines the program fully protects the public interest in that area of practice encompassed by the program. Those certificants are subject to board registration and discipline with review by that specialty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 784, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

773.

Licenses and specialty certificates issued pursuant to this article shall be valid for two years and shall expire on July 1 of each alternating year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 784, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

774.

(a) Issuance of a license may be denied if sufficient evidence is received by the board of the commission or doing by the applicant of an act that, if committed or done by a licensee, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of
 the licensee’s license.

(b) In a decision denying an application, the board may provide that it will accept no future application from the applicant until the applicant complies with specified conditions. The board shall not require a condition that is not just and reasonable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 44.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

775.

The board may upon its own motion, and shall upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, cause investigation to be made of the actions of any person licensed pursuant to this article, and may temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of any person who is guilty of or commits any one or more of the acts or omissions constituting cause for disciplinary action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

776.

Any accusation against a registrant or a certificant shall be filed within five years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the board has all the powers granted in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1297, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

777.

(a) If the board finds against the registrant, the board, in its decision, may terminate all operations of the registrant during the period fixed by the decision, except those operations the board determines that the person may complete. The board may impose upon the registrant compliance with specific conditions as may be just in connection with the registrant’s operations, and may further provide that, until the conditions are complied with, no application for restoration of the suspended or revoked registration shall be accepted by the board.

(b) The board shall provide public notice of the suspension or revocation pursuant to this section.

(c) The board may issue a private reprimand when a registrant commits a failure of responsibility that warrants a lesser level of discipline than suspension. The issuance of a private reprimand does not prohibit the board from using the subject of the private reprimand in an accusation, within the statute of limitations, seeking suspension or revocation resulting from a subsequent complaint, to establish a pattern of lesser failures of professional responsibility. If the evidence is insufficient to support a private reprimand or an accusation, the executive officer for registration may send a letter expressing the examining committee’s concerns.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 45.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

778.

A registrant or certificant is subject to disciplinary action who:

(a) Has been convicted of a felony substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a registered professional forester. A conviction within the meaning of this section means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the board is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(b) Has been found guilty by the board of any deceit, misrepresentation, fraud, material misstatement of fact, incompetence, or gross negligence in their practice.

(c) Has been guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining their registration or certification.